Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 2
CALL AND NOTICE

1-5-201. Notice of presidential primary election. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 702, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section repealed, p. 1409, § 43, effective July 1.

1-5-201.5. Legislative declaration - purpose.

The general assembly declares that the purpose of this part 2 is to provide adequate notice of elections at a reasonable cost to the taxpayers of the state and its political subdivisions.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1155, § 20, effective July 1.

1-5-202. Notice of presidential primary and primary election by secretary of state and county clerk and recorder. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 702, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1409, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1155, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1742, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 771, § 41, effective May 20.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1642, § 39, effective June 7.

1-5-203. Certification of ballot.

Except as provided in subsection (1)(c) of this section, no later than sixty days before any primary election, and no later than fifty-seven days before any general or odd-year November election or congressional vacancy election, the secretary of state shall deliver by electronic transmission and registered mail to the county clerk and recorder of each county a certificate in writing of the ballot order and content for each county, as follows:

For general elections, the certificate shall specify the national and state officers and the district officers of state concern for whom some or all of the eligible electors of the county are entitled to cast ballots at the general election. The certificate shall include the name and party or other designation of each candidate for whom some or all of the eligible electors of the county are entitled to cast ballots and for whom a petition or certificate of nomination has been filed with the secretary of state, the name and party of each candidate nominated at the primary election for a national or state office or a district office of state concern, and the order of the ballot and the ballot content for the election. With regard to the election of members to the general assembly, the notice shall also specify the district number and the names of the members whose terms of office will expire.

For primary elections, the certificate shall specify the offices for which nominations are to be made. The notice shall include a certified list of persons for whom certificates of designation or petitions have been filed with the secretary of state and the office for which each person is a candidate, together with the other details mentioned in the certificates of designation or petitions, and the order of the ballot for the primary election.

For any election at which one or more ballot issues or ballot questions are to be submitted to the eligible electors of the entire state, the secretary of state shall certify the order of ballot and ballot content with respect to such ballot issues or ballot questions to the county clerk and recorder of each county of the state.

The secretary of state shall be solely responsible for the accuracy of the information contained in the certificate.

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1626, § 4, effective June 7, 2002.)

No later than sixty days before any election, the designated election official of each political subdivision that intends to conduct an election shall certify the order of the ballot and ballot content. Such certification shall be delivered to the county clerk and recorder of each county that has territory within the political subdivision if the election is coordinated with the clerk and recorder. The order of the ballot and ballot content shall include the name and office of each candidate for whom a petition has been filed with the designated election official and any ballot issues or ballot questions to be submitted to the eligible electors.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1626, § 4, effective June 7, 2002.)

The state or a political subdivision that issues a certificate pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be solely responsible for the accuracy of the information contained in the certificate. Any error that can be corrected pursuant to the provisions of section

1-5-412

shall be corrected at the expense of the political subdivision whose designated election official issued the defective certificate or, at the expense of the state, if the secretary of state issued the defective certificate.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 703, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1409, § 45, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1156, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 772, § 42, effective May 20.

L. 2002:

(1), (2), (3)(a), and (3)(b) amended, p. 1626, § 4, effective June 7.

L. 2003:

IP(1) amended, p. 495, § 2, effective March 5.

L. 2005:

IP(1) and (3)(a) amended, p. 1402, § 21, effective June 6; IP(1) and (3)(a) amended, p. 1437, § 21, effective June 6.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1487, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2020:

IP(1)(a) amended and (1)(c) added, (HB 20-1359), ch. 23, p. 87, § 9, effective March 16.

1-5-204. Call for nominations for nonpartisan elections. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 703, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1409, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1157, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1742, § 32, effective July 1.

1-5-205. Published and posted notice of election - content.

The designated election official, or the coordinated election official if so provided by an intergovernmental agreement, no later than twenty days before each election, shall provide notice by publication of the election as described by section

1-1-104

(34), which notice must state, as applicable for the particular election for which notice is provided, the following:

The date of the election;

The hours during which the polling locations and, as appropriate, drop-off locations will be open;

The addresses of the polling locations;

The addresses of the drop-off locations;

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1627, § 5, effective June 7, 2002.)

(1.2) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1627, § 5, effective June 7, 2002.)

(1.3) A copy of the notice required by this section shall be posted at least ten days prior to the election and until two days after the election in a conspicuous place in the office of the designated election official or the clerk and recorder if the election is coordinated by the clerk and recorder. Sample ballots may be used as notices so long as the information required by this section is included with the sample ballot.

(1.4) Publication of the notice required by subsection (1) of this section by the clerk and recorder for a coordinated election shall satisfy the publication requirement for all political subdivisions participating in the coordinated election.

(1.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1627, § 5, effective June 7, 2002.)

At the time that notice by publication is made, the designated election official shall also mail a copy of the notice of the election to the county clerk and recorders of the counties in which the political subdivision is located if the clerk and recorder is not the coordinated election official.

When there is a vacancy for an unexpired term in any national or state office or a district office of state concern that is by law to be filled at any general or congressional vacancy election, the secretary of state, no later than fifty-five days prior to the election, shall give notice in writing by publishing a notice in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the state or in the congressional district in which the vacancy is to be filled. The notice shall specify the office in which the vacancy exists, the cause of the vacancy, the name of the officer in whose office it has occurred, and the time when the term of office will expire.

For a primary mail ballot election, in addition to the items described in subsection (1) of this section, the notice shall advise eligible electors who are not affiliated with a political party of the electors' ability to select and cast a ballot of one major political party in the primary election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 704, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1410, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1157, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 96:

IP(1), (1)(h), and (1)(i) amended and (1.2) added, p. 1743, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 99:

IP(1) and (1.5) amended, p. 773, § 43, effective May 20.

L. 2000:

(1)(g) amended, p. 299, § 7, effective August 2.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1627, § 5, effective June 7.

L. 2007:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1778, § 13, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

IP(1), (1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(d) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 709, § 36, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

(1)(e) repealed and (4) added, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 579, § 38, effective May 18.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3026, § 31, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-202 (2) as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For the correction of errors in publication, see § 1-5-412.

(2) In 2013, the introductory portion to subsection (1) and subsections (1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(d) were amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(3) For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-5-206. Postcard notice - reimbursement of mailing cost - definition. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 704, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1766, § 5, effective June 6; (1) and (2)(a) amended and (4) added, p. 1410, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1158, § 25, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1769, § 27, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 837, § 50, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 477, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(2)(a) amended, p. 773, § 44, effective May 20; (1) amended, p. 1389, § 8, effective June 4; (1) amended, p. 279, § 5, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1084, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2002:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, p. 1629, § 6, effective June 7.

L. 2007:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1778, § 14, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(a) amended and (5) added, p. 1875, § 2, effective June 2.

L. 2009:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1938, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 709, § 37, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

Entire section repealed, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 593, § 82, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 1-2-222 (1)(a) as it existed prior to 1992.

1-5-206.5. Ballot issue notice. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1159, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1775, § 84, effective July 1.

1-5-206.7. Failure to receive mailed notice.

Any election for which a notice was mailed shall not be invalidated on the grounds that an eligible elector did not receive the ballot issue notice, mailed information, or mailed notification of the election required by this code or the state constitution if the designated election official or coordinated election official acted in good faith in making the mailing. Good faith is presumed if the designated election official or coordinated election official mailed the ballot issue notice, information, or notification to the addresses appearing on a registration list for the political subdivision as provided by the county clerk and recorder, and, where applicable, the list of property owners provided by the county assessor.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1159, § 26, effective July 1.

1-5-207. Court-ordered elections.

When an election is ordered by the court for a special district, the court shall authorize the designated election official to give notice as provided in the order.

For an organizational election, the notice by publication shall include the purposes of the election, the estimated operating and debt service mill levies and fiscal year spending for the first year following organization, and the boundaries of the special district. The notice by publication shall recite the election date, which shall be not less than ten days after publication of the election notice.

For a dissolution election, the notice by publication shall include the plan for dissolution or a summary of the plan and the place where a member of the public may inspect or obtain a copy of the complete plan. The notice by publication shall recite the election date, which shall be not less than ten days after publication of the election notice.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 705, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1160, § 27, effective July 1.

1-5-208. Election may be canceled - when.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 832, § 11, effective May 5, 2010.)

(1.5) Except as provided in section 1-4-104.5, if the only matter before the electors in a nonpartisan election is the election of persons to office and if, at the close of business on the sixty-third day before the election, there are not more candidates than offices to be filled at the election, including candidates filing affidavits of intent, the designated election official, if instructed by resolution of the governing body, shall cancel the election and declare the candidates elected.

Except for initiative and recall elections, no later than twenty-five days before an election conducted as a coordinated election in November, and at any time prior to any other elections, a governing body may by resolution withdraw one or more ballot issues or ballot questions from the ballot. The ballot issues and ballot questions shall be deemed to have not been submitted and votes cast on the ballot issues and ballot questions shall either not be counted or shall be deemed invalid by action of the governing body.

If the electors are to consider the election of persons to office and ballot issues or ballot questions, the election may be canceled by the governing body only in the event that all of the conditions of subsection (1.5) of this section exist and that all ballot issues or ballot questions have been withdrawn from the ballot pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no election may be canceled in part.

Unless otherwise provided by an intergovernmental agreement pursuant to section 1-7-116, upon receipt of an invoice, the governing body shall within thirty days promptly pay all costs accrued by the county clerk and recorder and any coordinating political subdivision attributable to the canceled election or withdrawn ballot issues or ballot questions.

The governing body shall provide notice by publication of the cancellation of the election. A copy of the notice must be posted in the office of the designated election official and in the office of the clerk and recorder for each county in which the political subdivision is located and, for special districts, a copy of the notice must be filed in the office of the division of local government. The governing body shall also notify the candidates that the election was canceled and that they were elected by acclamation.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 705, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1160, § 28, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1769, § 28, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) and (6) amended, p. 837, § 51, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1743, § 34, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(2), (3), (4), and (5) amended, p. 790, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2010:

(1) and (1.5) amended, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 832, § 11, effective May 5.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 682, § 19, effective May 17.

L. 2013:

(6) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 710, § 38, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

(6) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 579, § 39, effective May 18.

L. 2018:

(6) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1608, § 12, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section in House Bill 94-1286 and House Bill 94-1294 were harmonized.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (6) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.